Florida, session 2026, HB6527.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
215
216 Section 1. The facts stated in the preamble to this act
217 are found and declared to be true.
218 Section 2. The Florida Sheriffs Risk Management Fund is
219 authorized and directed to appropriate from funds not otherwise
220 encumbered and to draw a warrant in the sum of $626,769.93
221 payable to Patricia Ermini as compensation for injuries and
222 damages sustained.
223 Section 3. The amount paid by the Florida Sheriffs Self
224 Insurance Fund, on behalf of its insured, the Lee County
225 Sheriff's Office, pursuant to s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and
Page 9 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6527-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6527 2026
226 the amount awarded under this act are intended to provide the
227 sole compensation for all present and future claims arising out
228 of the factual situation described in this act which resulted in
229 injuries and damages to Patricia Ermini. The total amount paid
230 for attorney fees relating to this claim may not exceed 25
231 percent of the total amount awarded under this act.
232 Section 4. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 10 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6527-00